Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska44-32,102
Grievance, defined.

Grievance shall mean a written complaint submitted in accordance with the health maintenance organization's formal grievance procedure by or on behalf of the enrollee regarding any aspect of the health maintenance organization relative to the enrollee.

Laws 1990, LB 1136, § 11.